Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1224
Rights of subjects.

In addition to the rights granted subjects by any other provisions of the Sex Offender Commitment Act, such subjects shall be entitled to the rights provided in sections 71-943 to 71-960 during proceedings concerning the subjects under the act.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 80.